Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-534
Directors; vacancy; filled by board of directors.

In addition to the events listed in section 32-560, a vacancy on the board of directors shall exist in the event of (1) removal from any district of a director, (2) removal of a director from a subdivision in which he or she was a director, or (3) elimination or detachment from a district of the part thereof where a director or directors reside. In the event of a vacancy, such vacancy shall be filled by the board of directors. Such appointments shall be in writing and continue for the unexpired term and until a successor is elected and qualified. The written appointment shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 9(5), p. 533;

Laws 1957, c. 124, § 20, p. 431;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 557.